Massachusetts, session 194th, S1199.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1 of chapter 258 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Authority”, in line 48, the following words:- ", 
any Law Enforcement Council established pursuant to section 4J of chapter 40".